California statutes. Education Code
(II) Establishing a procedure to allow a public agency, including the American Red Cross, to use school buildings, grounds, and equipment for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare. The school district or county office of education shall cooperate with the public agency in furnishing and maintaining the services as the school district or county office of education may deem necessary to meet the needs of the
 community.

(III) (ia) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, establishing a procedure to identify appropriate refuge shelter for all pupils and staff to be used in the event of an evacuation order by local authorities and notify the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries of this identified refuge, in order to first prioritize the safety of pupils and staff, and then the defense of that structure in the event of a fire. Each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, shall coordinate the procedure with the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries. For those schools under the jurisdiction of a school district or county office
 of education, the school district or county office of education shall be the entity that coordinates with the operational area having jurisdiction within each of the school’s boundaries.

(ib) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the development by each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, of a communication and evacuation plan, to be used in the event of an early notice evacuation warning, that allows enough time to evacuate all pupils and staff. These plans shall clearly identify a decision process to determine whether an evacuation order is appropriate.

(ic) For purposes of this subclause, “operational area” means an
 intermediate level of the state emergency services organization, consisting of a county and all political subdivisions within the county area, that serves as a link in the system of communication and coordination between the state’s emergency operation centers and the operating centers of the political subdivisions that make up the operational area, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8559 of the Government Code and Section 8605 of the Government Code.

(ii) The evaluation of a comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) and the review of a school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, shall include ensuring that the plan includes appropriate adaptations for pupils with disabilities, as required pursuant to clause (i).

(iii) (I) After the first evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted, and after each annual evaluation or review thereafter, a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves may bring concerns about an individual pupil’s ability to access disaster safety procedures described in the comprehensive school safety plan or the school safety plan to the school principal. If the school principal determines there is merit to a concern, the principal shall direct the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, to make appropriate modifications to the comprehensive school safety plan or school safety plan, as applicable, during the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph
 (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable. The school principal may direct the schoolsite council, the school safety planning committee, or the charter school, as applicable, to make such modifications before the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable.

(II) Subclause (I) does not prohibit a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves from bringing their concerns to the school principal before an evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is
 conducted.

(iv) All deliberations of the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, related to individual pupils with disabilities for purposes of the requirements of clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be subject to applicable state and federal laws regarding the privacy of pupil information.

(C) Policies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915 for pupils who committed an act listed in subdivision (c) of Section 48915 and other school-designated serious acts that would lead to suspension, expulsion, or mandatory expulsion recommendations pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 48900) of Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(D) Procedures to notify teachers of dangerous pupils pursuant to Section 49079.

(E) A discrimination and harassment policy consistent with the prohibition against discrimination contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1.

(F) The provisions of any schoolwide dress code, pursuant to Section 35183, that prohibits pupils from wearing “gang-related apparel,” if the school has adopted that type of a dress code. For those purposes, the comprehensive school safety plan shall define “gang-related apparel.” The definition shall be limited to apparel that, if worn or displayed on a school campus, reasonably could be determined to threaten the health and safety of the school environment. A schoolwide dress code established pursuant to this section and Section 35183 shall be enforced on the school campus and at any school-sponsored activity by the principal of the school or the person designated by the principal. For purposes of this subparagraph,
 “gang-related apparel” shall not be considered a protected form of speech pursuant to Section 48950.

(G) Procedures for safe ingress and egress of pupils, parents, and school employees to and from school.

(H) A safe and orderly environment conducive to learning at the school.

(I) The rules and procedures on school discipline adopted pursuant to Sections 35291, 35291.5, 47605, and 47605.6.

(J) Procedures for conducting tactical responses to criminal incidents, including procedures related to individuals with guns on school campuses and at school-related functions. The procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants shall be based on the specific needs and context of each school and community.

(K) If a comprehensive school safety plan includes procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants by conducting a drill, a school shall comply with all of the following relating to the drill:

(i) (I) The school shall not conduct a high-intensity drill.

(II) For purposes of this clause, “high-intensity drill” means a drill that includes simulations that mimic an actual school shooter or other armed assailant incident, including, but not limited to, theatrical makeup or other materials to give an image of blood or gunshot wounds, acting by an individual posing to be the assailant, acting by individuals posing as victims, or simulations that instruct pupils to actively resist an assailant by throwing objects, attacking, or swarming the assailant.

(ii) The school shall not include the use of real weapons, gunfire blanks, or explosions in the conducting of the drill.

(iii) The school shall ensure a trauma-informed approach to the design and execution of any drill, which shall include all of the following:

(I) Age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate drill content and terminology developed with the involvement of school personnel, including school-based mental health professionals.

(II) Notice to all parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel subject to the drills in advance of the drill and of the drill’s expected length of time.

(III) The ability for parents or guardians to opt their child or
 children out of the drills.

(IV) An announcement to pupils and educators immediately before the start of the drills and an announcement to pupils and educators immediately after the drills have concluded.

(V) A notice to all parents and guardians after the drill has concluded.

(VI) The provision of contact information for community-based resources, including local organizations with objectives to reduce gun violence or provide mental health counseling, to parents or guardians, pupils, and staff who are negatively impacted by the drills, and, where available, prioritizing school-based resources.

(L) Procedures to assess and respond to reports of any dangerous, violent, or unlawful activity that is being conducted or threatened to be conducted at the
 school, at an activity sponsored by the school, or on a schoolbus serving the school.

(M) (i) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated on or after July 1, 2025, procedures to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing a sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening medical emergency while on school grounds.

(ii) The procedures described in clause (i) are encouraged to integrate evidence-based core elements, including any cardiopulmonary resuscitation training offered and the placement of any automated external defibrillator available on the schoolsite in accordance with nationally recognized evidence-based emergency cardiac care guidelines, as dictated by the school safety plan.

(N) For schools that serve pupils in any of grades 7 to 12,
 inclusive, a protocol in the event a pupil is suffering or is reasonably believed to be suffering from an opioid overdose.

(3) (A) Beginning July 1, 2025, an instructional continuity plan to establish communication with pupils and their families and provide instruction to pupils when in-person instruction is disrupted due to an emergency pursuant to Section 41422 or subdivision (a) of Section 46392. The plan shall include all the following:

(i) Procedures for pupil engagement, as soon as practicable, and no later than five calendar days following the emergency. Procedures shall be designed to establish two-way communication with pupils and their families and identify and provide supports for pupils’ social-emotional, mental health, and academic needs.

(ii) A plan to provide access to in-person
 instruction or remote instruction pursuant to Sections 51747 and 51749.5, as soon as practicable, but no later than 10 instructional days following the emergency. The plan may include support to pupils and families to enroll in or be temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(B) Local educational agencies are encouraged to plan to meet instructional standards that are at least equivalent to those applicable to independent study programs.

(C) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “temporarily reassigned” means temporarily reassigned to another local educational agency outside of the school district, but within the county or an immediately adjacent county, in which the pupil’s parent or guardian resides. Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a pupil who is temporarily reassigned shall be deemed to
 have complied with the residency requirements for attendance in the local educational agency that is temporarily serving the pupil pursuant to this section.

(ii) Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may continue to enroll a pupil who is temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to this section in order to facilitate the timely reentry of the pupil in their prior school after the emergency event has ended.

(D) This paragraph applies to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that schools develop comprehensive school safety plans using existing resources, including the materials and services of the partnership,
 pursuant to this chapter. It is also the intent of the Legislature that schools use the handbook developed and distributed in partnership by the department’s Safe Schools and Violence Prevention Center and the Attorney General’s Crime and Violence Prevention Center entitled “Safe Schools: A Planning Guide for Action” in conjunction with developing their plan for school safety.

(c) Each schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, in developing and updating a comprehensive school safety plan, shall, where practical, consult, cooperate, and coordinate with other schoolsite councils or school safety planning committees.

(d) The comprehensive school safety plan may be evaluated and amended, as needed, by the school safety planning committee, but shall be evaluated at least once a year, to ensure that the comprehensive school safety plan is properly implemented. An updated
 file of all safety-related plans and materials shall be readily available for inspection by the public.

(e) As comprehensive school safety plans are reviewed and updated, the Legislature encourages all plans, to the extent that resources are available, to include policies and procedures aimed at the prevention of bullying.

(f) The comprehensive school safety plan, as written and updated by the schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, shall be submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32288.

(g) The department shall maintain and conspicuously post on its internet website a compliance checklist for developing a comprehensive school safety plan, and shall update the checklist when necessary.

(h) On or before March 1,
 2025, the Superintendent shall develop and post on the department’s internet website instructional continuity plan guidance, including guidance for continued academic and school engagement strategies during disruptions in instruction due to emergencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 4.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2031, pursuant to Sec. 15 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

32282.1.

(a) As comprehensive school safety plans are reviewed and updated, the Legislature encourages all plans, to the extent that resources are available, to include clear guidelines for the roles and responsibilities of mental health professionals, community intervention professionals, school counselors, school resource officers, and police officers on school campuses, if the school district uses these people.

(b) The guidelines developed pursuant to subdivision (a) are encouraged to include both of the
 following:

(1) Primary strategies to create and maintain a positive school climate, promote school safety, and increase pupil achievement, and prioritize mental health and intervention services, restorative and transformative justice programs, and positive behavior interventions and support.

(2) Consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 32282, protocols to address the mental health care of pupils who have witnessed a violent act at any time, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) While on school grounds.

(B) While going to
 or coming from school.

(C) During a lunch period whether on or off campus.

(D) During, or while going to or coming from, a school-sponsored activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 794, Sec. 2.   (AB 1271)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32282.5.

(a) The department shall electronically distribute disaster preparedness educational materials and lesson plans that are currently available to school districts and county offices of education.

(b) The department shall ensure that the disaster preparedness materials are available in at least the three most dominant primary languages spoken by English learners in California, according to the language census.

(c) The department shall coordinate with the Office of Emergency Services to make sure that all materials are reviewed and updated annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 70.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

32283.

The Department of Justice and the State Department of Education, in accordance with Section 32262, shall contract with one or more professional trainers to coordinate statewide workshops for school districts, county offices of education, and schoolsite personnel, and in particular school principals, to assist them in the development of their respective school safety and crisis response plans, and provide training in the prevention of bullying as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 48900. The Department of Justice and the State Department of Education shall work in cooperation with regard to the workshops coordinated and presented pursuant to the contracts. Implementation of this section shall be contingent upon the availability of funds in the annual Budget
 Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 732, Sec. 4.   (AB 1156)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

32283.5.

(a) (1) The department shall develop and post on its internet website an online training module to assist all school staff, school administrators, parents, pupils, and community members in increasing their knowledge of the dynamics of bullying and cyberbullying. The online training module shall include, but is not limited to, identifying an act of bullying or cyberbullying and implementing strategies to address bullying and cyberbullying.

(2) The online training module developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include information about how to support pupils who are bullied for being or being perceived as neurodivergent and include links to the resources related to neurodiversity developed by the University of California and California State
 University Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning.

(b) The department shall post on its internet website and annually update a list of available online training modules relating to bullying or bullying prevention.

(c) A school operated by a school district or a county office of education and a charter school shall annually make available the online training module developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) to certificated schoolsite employees and all other schoolsite employees who have regular interaction with pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 907, Sec. 3.   (SB 939)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

32284.

The comprehensive school safety plan may also include, at local discretion of the governing board of the school district and using local funds, procedures for responding to the release of a pesticide or other toxic substance from properties located within one-quarter mile of a school. No funds received from the state may be used for this purpose.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 35294.4 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32286.

(a) Each school shall adopt its comprehensive school safety plan by March 1, 2000, and shall review and update its plan by March 1, every year thereafter. A new school campus that begins offering classes to pupils after March 1, 2001, shall adopt a comprehensive school safety plan within one year of initiating operation, and shall review and update its plan by March 1, every year thereafter.

(b) Commencing in July 2000, and every July thereafter, each school shall report on the status of its school safety plan, including a description of its key elements in the annual school accountability report card prepared pursuant to Sections 33126 and 35256.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 35294.6 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32287.

If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that there has been a willful failure to make any report required by this article, the superintendent shall do both of the following:

(a) Notify the school district or the county office of education in which the willful failure has occurred.

(b) Make an assessment of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) against that school district or county office of education. This may be accomplished by deducting an amount equal to the amount of the assessment from the school district’s or county office of education’s future apportionment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 35294.7 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 19.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32288.

(a) (1) In order to ensure compliance with this article, each school shall forward its comprehensive school safety plan to the school district or county office of education for approval.

(2) The department shall develop and post on its Internet Web site best practices for reviewing and approving school safety plans.

(b) (1) Before adopting its comprehensive school safety plan, the schoolsite council or school safety planning committee shall hold a public meeting at the schoolsite in order to allow members of the public the opportunity to express an opinion about the school safety plan.

(2) The schoolsite council or school safety planning committee shall notify, in writing, the following persons and entities, if available, of the public meeting:

(A) The local mayor.

(B) A representative of the local school employee organization.

(C) A representative of each parent organization at the schoolsite, including the parent teacher association and parent teacher clubs.

(D) A representative of each teacher organization at the schoolsite.

(E) A representative of the student body government.

(F) All persons who have indicated they want to be notified.

(3) The schoolsite council or school safety planning committee is encouraged to notify, in writing, the following persons and entities, if available, of the public meeting:

(A) A representative of the local churches.

(B) Local civic leaders.

(C) Local business organizations.

(c) In order to ensure compliance with this article, each school district or county office of education shall annually notify the department by October 15 of any schools that have not complied with Section 32281.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 806, Sec. 4.   (AB 1747)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32289.

A complaint of noncompliance with the school safety planning requirements of Title IV of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 7114 (d)(7)) may be filed with the department under the Uniform Complaint Procedures as set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 29) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 70.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

32289.5.

(a) The department shall collect, and local educational agencies shall provide, data pertaining to lockdown or multioption response drills conducted at schoolsites within school districts, county offices of education and charter schools providing instructional services to pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive. The data may be collected from a representative sample of schoolsites, with a methodology to be determined by the Superintendent. Specifically, the department shall collect data including, but not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The portion of schoolsites conducting drills and the population they serve.

(2) The types of drills
 performed and their frequency.

(3) Information about staff training in preparation for drills.

(4) Information pertaining to schoolsite evaluations, if any, of the drill impacts.

(5) Information pertaining to staff and parental notifications of drills.

(b) The department shall either conduct, or contract with a nonprofit research entity to conduct, a study that identifies best practices for age-appropriate drills, the effectiveness of lockdown or multioption response drills in schools, and the effects drills have on pupil emotional wellbeing and emergency preparedness.

(c) (1) The department shall submit to the Governor and relevant policy committees of the
 Legislature on or before November 1, 2021, a report containing data collected pursuant to subdivision (a) and findings and recommendations from the study conducted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this subdivision shall become inoperative on November 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   (SB 541)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

32289.6.

(a) On or before June 15, 2025, the department shall curate and post on its internet website best practices pertaining to school shooter or other armed assailant drills, including, but not limited to, guidance for age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate drills, including age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate language, and staff training tools pertaining to school shooter or other armed assailant drills, for use by school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools providing instructional services to pupils in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) A school district,
 county office of education, and charter school is encouraged to comply with all the best practices established by the department pursuant subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.   (AB 1858)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.3. Safety Devices [32290. - 32290.]

32290.

The partnership shall discuss with providers of telephone equipment and services, and shall acquire information regarding, the availability of no-cost or reduced-cost cellular telephones and services to be provided on a statewide basis to each public school teacher for use as a classroom safety device. Although the primary purpose of providing the cellular telephones is school safety, a teacher receiving a cellular telephone as a result of these discussions, shall be encouraged to use the cellular telephone for school related purposes other than school safety. These purposes would include purposes that further the smooth administration of general classroom and school functions, including, but not limited to, communicating with parents about a pupil’s education, communication with pupils about classwork and homework assignments, and communicating with other teachers and school administrators about school operations generally. Thus, the discussions between the partnership and the providers shall include the availability of no-cost or reduced-cost services in consideration of the complete usage contemplated pursuant to this section. The partnership shall ensure that each school district, county office of education, schoolsite council, and school safety planning committee developing a school safety plan pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 32280) is provided with information regarding the availability of the no-cost or reduced-cost cellular telephones and services for consideration in developing its plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Teen Court Program [32295.5. - 32295.5.]

32295.5.

The School Law Enforcement Partnership, established pursuant to Section 32262, shall provide information to school districts and county offices of education about teen or peer court programs. A teen or peer court program shall include, but not be limited to, any program in which juvenile court judges preside over a court in which the defendant is a pupil with no prior criminal record, who is charged with a nonviolent crime and in which the jurors are also pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Miscellaneous [32300. - 32435.]



  ARTICLE 1. Printing and Binding [32300. - 32300.]

32300.

All printing or binding required by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the State Board of Education, or by any educational institution, except the California Community Colleges and the University of California, supported entirely out of state funds, and all school registers and blank forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the use of officers charged with the administration of the laws relating to the public schools, including blank teachers’ certificates, and diplomas of graduation from elementary schools in districts not governed by city boards of education, shall be performed by the Department of General Services in the form and manner and at the prices of other state printing, and be paid for in like manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 182.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Printing Schools [32310. - 32312.]

32310.

No printing concern, institution, or other agency maintaining a printing plant or department for the purpose of instruction or the teaching of the art of printing, or allied arts, and whose purpose is to teach or instruct its students or members, shall produce, print, or cause to be printed any material whatsoever that may be placed on the market in competition with regularly established printing plants or concerns, if such printing concern, institution, or other agency is supported or operated from public or state funds or is tax free in any manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

32311.

This article does not apply to:

(a) Any institution classified as an educational institution within the meaning and intent of Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States or of Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code and that, nevertheless, pays general state and county taxes within this state upon any printing plant and printing equipment owned by it.

(b) The production of forms, materials, and supplies at any state educational institution under the exclusive management and control of the state and authorized by law.

(c) Any publication, printed and produced at any state educational institution under the exclusive management and control of the state for the dissemination of technical or scientific information and that is sold at cost.

(d) Printing which may be classified as “instruction” or “student activity.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

32312.

The violation of this article is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Use of County Funds for Agriculture [32330. - 32330.]

32330.

The boards of supervisors of any county may appropriate and use county funds for the support and maintenance of extension work in agriculture and home economics. The extension work shall be designed for the benefit of the respective counties and conducted under the approval of the United States Department of Agriculture and in cooperation with the University of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Unlawful Issuance of a Credential [32340. - 32341.]

32340.

Any state, county, or city and county superintendent, or any state, county, or city and county board of education, who issues a credential, except as provided by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

32341.

Except where such service is provided by a school district pursuant to Section 44332.5, each county or city and county board of education may provide for the registration of any valid certification or other document authorizing the holder thereof to serve in a position requiring certification qualifications as an employee of the county superintendent of schools of such county or city and county or of a school district under the jurisdiction of such county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 6.   Effective June 11, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. District Liability on Loaned Equipment [32350. - 32350.]

32350.

Any person, corporation, firm, or public entity, or employee thereof, who gratuitously loans equipment of any description or the services of an employee to a school district or community college district shall not be liable, and the school district or community college district shall be liable, for damages because of personal injuries to, or the death of any person or damage to property resulting from the operation of such equipment or an act or omission of such employee occurring while such equipment or employee is under the supervision and control of the district.

This section does not apply to any person, corporation, firm, or public entity who gratuitously loans mechanically defective equipment of any description or who gratuitously loans the services of an employee who is not fully qualified to perform such service, and such defect or lack of qualification is the cause of any damage or injury.

An employee whose services are loaned to a school district or community college district pursuant to this section remains an employee of his employer for all purposes, including the application of the provisions of the Labor Code relating to workmen’s compensation.

For the purposes of this section, “public entity” includes the state, the Regents of the University of California, a county, city, city and county, district, public authority, public agency, or any other political subdivision or public corporation in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Copyright Laws [32360. - 32361.]

32360.

No funds shall be expended by a school district, a community college district, a county board of education, or a county superintendent of schools to secure a copyright for any person or firm, but nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the governing board of any school district, community college district, or county board of education from securing copyrights, in the name of the district or board, to all copyrightable works developed by the district or board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

32361.

A school district, a community college district, a county board of education, or a county superintendent of schools shall not use the regular worktime of any employee to secure a copyright for any person or firm, but nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the governing board of any school district, community college district, or county board of education from securing copyrights, in the name of the district or board, to all copyrightable works developed by the district or board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Recycling Paper [32370. - 32376.]

32370.

The Legislature finds and declares that is the policy of the state to conserve and protect its resources. The maintenance of a quality environment for the people of this state now and in the future is a matter of statewide concern.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the volume of solid waste generated within the state coupled with an increased rate in the consumption of paper products and the absence of adequate programs and procedures for the reuse of these materials threaten the quality of the environment and well-being of the people of California.

In making these findings the Legislature declares that the policy and intent of this article is to increase the public’s awareness of the value of recycling and the need to recycle, and to improve environmental quality by the recycling of paper products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 885.)
-------------------------------------------

32371.

The following definitions govern the interpretation of this article:

(a) “Educational agency” means any school district, county office of education, or campus of the California State University and Colleges.

(b) “Paper recycling program” means, (1) the provision of specially marked containers which are intended to receive either all grades or only some grades of postconsumer wastepaper but which are not intended to receive other forms of postconsumer waste, (2) publicity directed at all persons who frequent buildings with the containers encouraging those persons to deposit wastepaper in the containers, and (3) the collection of all paper deposited in the containers for the purpose of recycling.

(c) “Postconsumer waste” means a finished material which would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item. 

(d) “Recycled paper” means all paper and woodpulp products with not less than 50 percent of its total weight consisting of secondary and postconsumer waste and with not less than 10 percent of its total weight consisting of postconsumer waste.

(e) “Secondary waste” means fragments of products or finished products of a manufacturing process which has converted a virgin resource into a commodity of real economic value, and includes postconsumer waste, but does not include mill broke, wood slabs, chips, sawdust, or other wood residue from a manufacturing process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

32372.

(a) Each school district may, and is encouraged to, establish and maintain a paper recycling program in all classrooms, administrative offices, and other areas owned or leased by the school district where a significant quantity of wastepaper is generated or may be collected.

(b) Each campus of the California State University and Colleges may, and is encouraged to, establish and maintain a paper recycling program in administration offices and other areas owned or leased by the campus, including areas frequented by students, where a significant quantity of wastepaper is generated or may be collected.

(c) In establishing paper recycling programs, school districts, and campuses of the California State University and Colleges shall attempt to cooperate with existing paper recycling programs.
